Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.020

Purpose.

The purpose of the program created in RCW 28B.12.010 is to provide financial assistance to needy students, including needy students from middle-income families, attending eligible post-secondary institutions in the state of Washington by stimulating and promoting their employment, thereby enabling them to pursue courses of study at such institutions. An additional purpose of this program shall be to provide such needy students, wherever possible, with employment related to their academic or vocational pursuits.

[ 1994 c 130 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.